test/src/morphology/N-ty_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - ты: # Noun 'reindeer' - partial paradigm /Type 4/
     ты+N+Sg+Nom: ты
     ты+N+Sg+Acc: тымʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen: тыʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat: тэнʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc: тэхэна
     ты+N+Sg+Abl: тэхэд
     ты+N+Sg+Pros: тэвна
     ты+N+Du+Nom: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom: тыˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc: ты
     ты+N+Pl+Gen: тыˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Dat: тэхэˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc: тэхэˮна
     ты+N+Pl+Abl: тэхэт
     ты+N+Pl+Pros: тэˮэмна    
          
     ты+N+Tra: тэӈэ
     ты+N+Car: тэсиˮ
     ты+N+Equ: тэдремʼ
     ты+N+Equ+Lat: тэдревʼ
     
# Possessive forms 

     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: тэв 
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: тэр  
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тэда 
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: тэмиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: тэриʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: тэдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: тэраˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: тэдоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тэв   
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: тэми  
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тэмд  
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тэмда 
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: тэмиʼ 
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: тэмдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: тэмдиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: тэваˮ 
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: тэмдаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: тэмдоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тэн
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: тэни
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тэнд
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тэнда 
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: тэниʼ 
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: тэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: тэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: тэнаˮ 
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: тэндаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: тэндоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тэхэн
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: тэхэни
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: тэхэнд
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: тэхэнда
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: тэхэниʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: тэхэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: тэхэндиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: тэхэнаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: тэхэндаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: тэхэндоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тэхэнан
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: тэхэнани
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: тэхэнанд
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: тэхэнанда 
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: тэхэнаниʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: тэхэнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: тэхэнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: тэхэнанаˮ 
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: тэхэнандаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: тэхэнандоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тэхэдан   
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: тэхэдани  
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: тэхэданд  
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: тэхэданда 
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: тэхэданиʼ 
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: тэхэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: тэхэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: тэхэданаˮ 
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: тэхэдандаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: тэхэдандоʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тэвнан   
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: тэвнани  
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: тэвнанд  
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: тэвнанда 
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: тэвнаниʼ 
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: тэвнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: тэвнандиʼ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: тэвнанаˮ 
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: тэвнандаˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: тэвнандоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: тэхэюн  
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: тэхэюд  
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: тэхэюда 
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: тэхэюдоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: тэхэюн  
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: тэхэюд  
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: тэхэюда 
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: тэхэюдиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: тэхэюдоʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: тэхэюн  
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: тэхэют  
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: тэхэюта 
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: тэхэюниʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: тэхэютиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: тэхэютиʼ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: тэхэютаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: тэхэютоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тын
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тыд   
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тыда  
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тыниʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тыдиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тыдиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тынаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тыдаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тыдоʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тын 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тыд   
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тыда 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тыниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тыдиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тыдиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тынаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тыдаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тыдоʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тыˮн
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тыт   
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тыта  
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тыˮниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тытиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тытиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тыˮнаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тытаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тытоʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: тэхэˮн 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: тэхэт 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: тэхэта 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: тэхэˮниʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: тэхэтиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: тэхэтиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: тэхэˮнаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: тэхэтаˮ 
     ты+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: тэхэтоʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: тэхэˮнан  
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: тэхэˮнат  
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: тэхэˮната 
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: тэхэˮнаниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: тэхэˮнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: тэхэˮнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: тэхэˮнанаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: тэхэˮнатаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: тэхэˮнатоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: тэхэтан
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: тэхэтат 
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: тэхэтата 
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: тэхэтаниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: тэхэтатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: тэхэтатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: тэхэтанаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: тэхэтатаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: тэхэтатоʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тэˮмнан  
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тэˮмнат  
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тэˮмната 
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тэˮмнаниʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тэˮмнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тэˮмнатиʼ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тэˮмнанаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тэˮмнатаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тэˮмнатоʼ
     
# Predestinative 

     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [тэдав, тэдув]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: тэдар
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [тэдда, тэдада]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [тэдамиʼ, тэдмиʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [тэдариʼ, тэдриʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [тэдадиʼ, тэддиʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [тэдаваˮ, тэдваˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [тэдараˮ, тэдраˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [тэдадоʼ, тэддоʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [тэдав, тэдув]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: тэдамд
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: тэдамда
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [тэдамиʼ, тэдмиʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: тэдамдиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: тэдамдиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [тэдаваˮ, тэдваˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: тэдамдаˮ
     ты+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: тэдамдоʼ    
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: тэдан
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: тэданд
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: тэданда
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [тэданиʼ, тэдниʼ]
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: тэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: тэдандиʼ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [тэданаˮ, тэднаˮ]
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: тэдандаˮ
     ты+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: тэдандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: тэдмʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тэн  
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ты   
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: тэниʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: тэдиʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: тэхэʼ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: тэдаˮ
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тыˮ  
     
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: тэдамзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: тэнась 
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [тысь, тэсь]
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: тэнинзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: тэдинзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: тэхэнзь
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: тэваць 
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: тэдаць 
     ты+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: [тыць, тэць]
     
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэв
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэр   
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэда   
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэмиʼ  
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэриʼ  
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэдиʼ 
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэваˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэраˮ
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тэдоʼ  
    
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюн
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюд
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюда   
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюниʼ  
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюдиʼ  
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюдиʼ 
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюнаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюдаˮ
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: тэхэюдоʼ
     
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тын
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыд   
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыда   
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыниʼ  
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыдиʼ  
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыдиʼ 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тынаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыдаˮ
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тыдоʼ 
     
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэвась
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэрась
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэдась 
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэминзь 
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэринзь
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэдинзь
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэваць
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэраць
     ты+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: тэдонзь 
     
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюнась
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдась
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдась 
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюнинзь 
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдинзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдинзь
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюнаць
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдаць
     ты+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: тэхэюдонзь
     
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тынась
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдась
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдась 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тынинзь 
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдинзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдинзь
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тынаць
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдаць
     ты+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тыдонзь
     
